Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4219.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000 of Title 75A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this act, "covered facility" means any proposed
facility or installation falling within one or more of the following
North American Industry Classification System (NAICS) codes or
functionally equivalent operations:
1. NAICS 221115, relating to wind electric power generation;
2. NAICS 221121, relating to electric bulk power transmission
and control, when used primarily for wind energy transmission;
Req. No. 16115 Page 1

3. NAICS 423930 or 562920, relating to recyclable material
merchants and materials recovery facilities, when used for wind-
turbine component recycling or decommissioning;
4. NAICS 518210, relating to data processing, hosting, and
computing infrastructure providers, when used for operation of a
large-scale data center;
5. NAICS 221122 relating to grid-scale battery storage
installations; and
6. Activities relating to carbon capture, carbon recapture,
carbon-sequestration, or related scientific or industrial
operations.
B. A covered facility shall:
1. Be set back no less than five hundred (500) feet from the
property line;
2. Possess the capital to pay for all the infrastructure needed
for construction, upgrades, and ongoing operation of the facility;
and
3. Create an Environmental Improvement and Mitigation Fund to
pay for the removal of material, supplies, and facilities when they
become obsolete.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16115 MJ 02/04/26

Req. No. 16115 Page 2